Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 2. Gifts, Escheats and Forfeitures

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

27 Am. Jur. 2d Escheat § 1 et seq.

Validity, construction, and application of lost or abandoned goods statutes, 23 ALR4th 1025.

30A C.J.S. Escheat § 1 et seq.

§ 9-5-201.
Grants, gifts and devises to state.

All grants, gifts and devises that have been or may be made to the state, and not otherwise appropriated by the terms of the grant, gift or devise, shall be accepted as trust funds in the care of the state, and shall be kept for the exclusive benefit of the public schools. The income from the trust funds shall be disbursed as the account for common schools within the permanent land income fund is disbursed.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 105, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 110-301; C.S. 1945, § 22-201; W.S. 1957, § 9-685; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-601; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to power of board of wills to dispose of property received by state, see §

9-5-205

.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 2, ch. 105, Laws 1927, repeals all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

Property bequeathed to state with income to legatee not unappropriated.—

Where property is bequeathed to the state with an annual income payable to a legatee out of income, the property cannot be considered “not otherwise appropriated.” Bond v. State, 45 Wyo. 133, 16 P.2d 53,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1932).

§ 9-5-202.
Right to property within state.

The original and ultimate right of all property, real and personal, within the limits of this state, is in the people thereof.

All property, real and personal, within the limits of this state, which does not belong to any person, belongs to the state. Whenever the title to any property fails for want of legal heirs, it reverts to the state.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 85, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1899, §§ 2305, 2306; C.S. 1910, §§ 3136, 3137; C.S. 1920, §§ 3910, 3911; R.S. 1931, §§ 39-101, 39-102; C.S. 1945, §§ 22-202, 22-203; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-686, 9-687; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-8-602, 9-8-603; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

This section and §

9-5-203

must necessarily be read in pari materia.

It is apparent the legislature intended the sections to apply whenever title to any property fails for want of owners.
Kirby Royalties, Inc. v. Texaco, Inc., 458 P.2d 101,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1969).

Doubt as to escheat resolved against state. —

Any doubt as to whether the state could claim an escheat of the property will be resolved against the state. Dutton v. Donahue, 44 Wyo. 52, 8 P.2d 90,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1932).

Alien heir may dispose of inherited property before state action. —

An alien heir may dispose of property inherited in good faith and give good title before the commencement of an action by the state. Dutton v. Donahue, 44 Wyo. 52, 8 P.2d 90,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1932).

And sale defeats escheat. —

The sale and conveyance of property bars an action for escheat by the state, though the purchase money is held in escrow. Dutton v. Donahue, 44 Wyo. 52, 8 P.2d 90,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1932).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Survival of Certain Feudal Law Concepts in Wyoming,” see 2 Wyo. L.J. 91.

For article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison With the Uniform Probate Code — Part I,” see 7 Land & Water L. Rev. 169 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Forfeiture of property for unlawful use, before trial of individual offender, 3 ALR2d 738.

Escheat of unclaimed deposits required by public utility, 43 ALR2d 1262.

Escheat of estate of illegitimate, 48 ALR2d 759.

Escheat of personal property of intestate, domiciled or resident in another state, 50 ALR2d 1375.

Escheat to state of proceeds of insurance policy where insured was murdered by beneficiary, who was the sole distributee of insured, 27 ALR3d 794.

§ 9-5-203.
Recovery of escheated or forfeited property; general procedure; proceedings where estate without known heirs; unclaimed payments; disposition of property obtained.

Whenever any property escheats or is forfeited to the state for its use, the legal title vests in the state from the time of the escheat or forfeiture. A complaint may be filed by the county attorney of the proper county or by the attorney general in the name of the state of Wyoming against the person or bank which possesses the escheated or forfeited property, in the district court of the proper county for the recovery of the property, alleging the grounds on which the recovery is claimed, and like proceedings in judgment shall be had as in a civil action for the recovery of property. In any such action due proof that any real or personal property has been unclaimed for five (5) years immediately prior to the time of filing the complaint and that the name or whereabouts of the owner of the property is unknown is prima facie evidence of the failure of title to the property for want of legal heirs.

In cases where probate proceedings are commenced upon the estate of any person without known heirs no action under subsection (a) of this section need be brought. The court having jurisdiction of the estate shall enter a decree in the estate, distributing the unclaimed property remaining for distribution in the estate to the state of Wyoming. Where probate proceedings have been commenced but have never been completed, the county attorney or attorney general may proceed as provided by subsection (a) of this section. In any such estate, the failure of any heirs or devisees of the deceased to appear and establish a claim within the time fixed by the notice of final settlement of the estate for filing objections to the final account and petition for distribution is prima facie evidence of the failure of title to the property of the estate for want of legal heirs or devisees.

In all cases in which any property, or any refunds, dividends or other payments are ordered to be conveyed or paid to persons in the state of Wyoming by a decree, judgment or order of any court or governmental agency, and the property, refunds, dividends or other payments are not claimed by the person entitled thereto within the time fixed or limited by the order of the court or governmental agency directing the payment thereof, the property, refunds, dividends or other payments are the property of the state of Wyoming, subject to subsection (d) of this section. At the expiration of the fixed or limited time, the court or governmental agency shall enter the proper decree, judgment or order directing that the property escheat to the state of Wyoming.

All funds obtained by the state by escheat or forfeiture, shall be paid over to the state treasurer and kept by him in a separate account for a period of five (5) years during which time the monies are payable by him to the true owners upon presentment of a proper claim supported by satisfactory proof of ownership. After expiration of the five (5) year period without lawful claim, the funds shall be credited to the common school permanent land fund account. All real and personal property obtained by the state of Wyoming by escheat or forfeiture shall be received by and shall be under the direction and control of the state treasurer who shall give a receipt to the court therefor. The property shall be held in kind, except as hereinafter provided, by the state treasurer for a period of five (5) years during which time it is subject to claims by the rightful owners who may file their claims in the court which had original jurisdiction of the property. After the expiration of the five (5) year period without lawful claim therefor, the state treasurer shall sell the personal property at public or private sale, and shall sell the real property in the manner provided in W.S.

36-9-101

through

36-9-120

for the sale of state lands. The proceeds received from the sale shall be paid into the state treasury of the state and shall be credited by the state treasurer to the common school permanent land fund account.

All real property held by the state treasurer during the five (5) year redemption period provided by subsection (d) of this section, may be transferred by the state treasurer to the state board of land commissioners to be administered as other state lands and shall not be sold except as hereafter provided. When any real or personal property will, in the opinion of the state treasurer, depreciate in value, the state treasurer may petition the court which had original jurisdiction over the property, for an order directing the sale of the property. Upon receipt of the order the state treasurer shall dispose of the property as ordered by the court. Any monies obtained by the conversion shall be credited to a separate account for the remaining five (5) years, during which time the monies shall be payable by the state treasurer to the true owners in the manner, and upon proof, as provided in subsection (d) of this section.

This section does not apply to property which is subject to the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act, W.S.

34-24-101

through

34-24-140

.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 85, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 2307; C.S. 1910, § 3138; Laws 1911, ch. 57, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3912; R.S. 1931, § 39-103; C.S. 1945, § 22-204; Laws 1947, ch. 86, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-688; Laws 1959, ch. 168, § 1; 1961, ch. 150, § 1; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-604; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1992, ch. 2, § 1; 1993, ch. 213, § 2; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 101.

Cross references. —

As to disposition of unclaimed automobiles seized under antitheft law, see §

31-11-104

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the trust and agency fund” in (d) and (e).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), substituted “A complaint” for “An information,” and made similar changes; and in (b), substituted “may proceed as provided” for “may proceed by information as provided.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

This section and §

9-5-202

must necessarily be read in pari materia.

It is apparent the legislature intended the sections to apply whenever title to any property fails for want of owners.
Kirby Royalties, Inc. v. Texaco, Inc., 458 P.2d 101,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1969).

Escheat not favored. —

This section is treated the same to some extent as a forfeiture, which is not favored. Dutton v. Donahue, 44 Wyo. 52, 8 P.2d 90,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1932).

Doubt as to escheat resolved against state. —

Any doubt as to whether the state could claim an escheat of the property will be resolved against the state. Dutton v. Donahue, 44 Wyo. 52, 8 P.2d 90,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1932).

Alien heir may dispose of inherited property before state action. —

An alien heir may dispose of property inherited in good faith and give good title before the commencement of an action by the state. Dutton v. Donahue, 44 Wyo. 52, 8 P.2d 90,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1932).

And sale defeats escheat. —

The sale and conveyance of property by an alien bars an action for escheat by the state, though the purchase money is held in escrow. Dutton v. Donahue, 44 Wyo. 52, 8 P.2d 90,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1932).

“Information” filed by state actually “complaint.” —

This section authorizes the filing of an “information” which is actually a “complaint” within the meaning of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure. State v. Moore, 356 P.2d 141,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1960).

Right of state to intervene for escheat doubtful. —

The right of the state to an order for an escheat by intervening in a statutory proceeding for the determination of heirship in the matter of the administration of an estate is doubtful in view of this section. In re Black's Estate, 30 Wyo. 55, 216 P. 1059,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1923).

Claimant must show ownership in himself. —

Having failed to show ownership in himself for the interest in question, the claimant has no standing to complain if such interest is escheated to the state. He cannot in any event prove title in himself merely by finding fault with the state's title. Stroock v. Kirby Royalties, 494 P.2d 197,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1972).

Law reviews. —

For note, “The Modern Gold Rush — Intangible Personal Property and Escheat,” see 18 Wyo. L.J. 70 (1963).

§ 9-5-204.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 2, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1931, ch. 76, §§ 1 and 4, related to the creation and composition of the board of wills and trusts.

§ 9-5-205.
Will contests; powers and duties of state treasurer and attorney general.

The state treasurer and the attorney general shall investigate and examine all contests against any will, grant or gift in which the state is a devisee, legatee, beneficiary or grantee for the purpose of ascertaining and becoming advised as to the merits of the contentions of the contestant and the probability or improbability of the contests being successful. After investigation and examination, the state treasurer and attorney general shall consider and determine the advisability of compromising and settling the contests on behalf of the state and consider and determine the terms upon which the contests should be settled and compromised. If the state treasurer and the attorney general deem it to be in the best interests of the state that the contests be settled and compromised, then they may settle and compromise the contests upon terms deemed to be the best interests of the state. The attorney general may enter into and execute, on behalf of the state, agreements or contracts compromising and settling the contests and defining and fixing the terms thereof.

The state treasurer shall:

Receive, take charge of and administer all personal chattels received by the state as a devisee, legatee, beneficiary, grantee or by escheat;

Convert the same by sale, foreclosure, legal process or otherwise into money; and

Credit the monies to the funds for which the monies were directed and intended in the grant, gift or devise. When not otherwise directed by the terms of the grant, gift or devise, the monies shall be credited to the common school permanent land fund account.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 76, §§ 2, 3; R.S. 1931, §§ 103-502, 103-503; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-402, 18-403; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-691, 9-692; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-8-607, 9-8-608; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1992, ch. 2, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to disposition generally of grants, gifts and devises to state, see §

9-5-201

.

As to powers of state treasurer regarding monies donated to state, see §

21-2-603

.